Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5422
Reports.

The Department of Economic Development shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1 listing the recipients and grant amounts for grants made under the Agricultural Opportunities and Value-Added Partnerships Act in the previous year, the documented and measurable impacts of the grants, and an evaluation of the performance of the grant program based on the measurable goals and expected outcomes of the recipients of such grants. Copies of the program performance evaluation shall be made available through print and electronic media.

Laws 2005, LB 90, § 13.
January 1, 2015